Alaska statutes. Title 13. Decedents’ Estates, Guardianships, Transfers, Trusts, and Health Care Decisions.
Article 6. Allocation of Receipts during Administration of Trust.

Sec. 13.38.600.
Allocation of property from entities.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, a trustee shall allocate to income money received from an entity, including reinvested cash dividends.

A trustee shall allocate the following receipts from an entity to principal:

property other than money excluding reinvested cash dividends;

money received in one distribution or a series of related distributions in exchange for part or all of a trust’s interest in the entity;

money received in total or partial liquidation of the entity;

money received from an entity that is a regulated investment company or a real estate investment trust if the money distributed is a short-term or long-term capital gain dividend for federal income tax purposes.

Money is received in partial liquidation

to the extent that the entity, at or near the time of a distribution, indicates that it is a distribution in partial liquidation; or

if the total amount of money and property received in a distribution or series of related distributions is greater than 20 percent of the entity’s gross assets, as shown by the entity’s year-end financial statements immediately preceding the initial receipt.

Money is not received in partial liquidation, and it may not be taken into account under (c)(2) of this section, to the extent that it does not exceed the amount of income tax that a trustee or beneficiary must pay on taxable income of the entity that distributes the money.

A trustee may rely upon a statement made by an entity about the source or character of a distribution if the statement is made at or near the time of distribution by the entity’s board of directors or other person or group of persons authorized to exercise powers to pay money or transfer property comparable to those of a corporation’s board of directors.

In this section, “entity” means a corporation, partnership, limited liability company, regulated investment company, real estate investment trust, common trust fund, or another organization in which a trustee has an interest, but does not include

a trust or estate to which AS

13.38.610

applies;

a business or activity to which AS

13.38.620

applies;

a payment to which AS

13.38.690

applies; or

an asset-backed security to which AS

13.38.750

applies.

History.

(§ 2 ch 145 SLA 2003)

Sec. 13.38.610.
Distribution from trust or estate.

A trustee shall allocate to income an amount received as a distribution of income from a trust or an estate in which the trust has an interest other than a purchased interest.

A trustee shall allocate to principal an amount received as a distribution of principal from a trust or estate in which the trust has an interest other than a purchased interest.

If a trustee purchases an interest in a trust that is an investment entity, or a decedent or donor transfers an interest in a trust that is an investment entity to a trustee, AS

13.38.600

or

13.38.750

applies to a receipt from the trust.

History.

(§ 2 ch 145 SLA 2003)

Sec. 13.38.620.
Business and other activities conducted by trustee.

If a trustee that conducts a business or other activity determines that it is in the best interest of all the beneficiaries to account separately for the business or other activity instead of accounting for it as part of the trust’s general accounting records, the trustee may maintain separate accounting records for the transactions of the business or other activity, whether or not the assets of the business or other activity are segregated from other trust assets.

A trustee who accounts separately for a business or other activity may determine the extent to which

its net cash receipts are retained for working capital, the acquisition or replacement of fixed assets, and other reasonably foreseeable needs of the business or activity; and

the remaining net cash receipts are accounted for as principal or income in the trust’s general accounting records.

If a trustee sells assets of the business or other activity, other than in the ordinary course of the business or activity, the trustee shall account for the net amount received as principal in the trust’s general accounting records to the extent the trustee determines that the amount received is not required any longer in the conduct of the business.

Activities for which a trustee may maintain separate accounting records include

retail, manufacturing, service, and other traditional business activities;

farming;

raising and selling livestock and other animals;

management of rental properties;

extraction of minerals and other natural resources;

timber operations; and

activities to which AS

13.38.740

applies.

History.

(§ 2 ch 145 SLA 2003)

Sec. 13.38.630.
Principal receipts.

A trustee shall allocate to principal any of the following:

to the extent not allocated to income under this chapter, assets received from

a transferor during the transferor’s lifetime;

a decedent’s estate;

a trust with a terminating income interest; or

a payor under a contract naming the trust or its trustee as beneficiary;

money or other property received from a principal asset’s sale, exchange, liquidation, or change in form, including realized profit subject to AS

13.38.600

—

13.38.750

;

amounts recovered from third parties to reimburse the trust because of disbursements described in AS

13.38.810(a)(8)

or for other reasons, to the extent not based on the loss of income, except that a separate award made for the loss of income with respect to an accounting period during which a current income beneficiary had a mandatory income interest is income;

net income received in an accounting period during which there is not a beneficiary to whom a trustee may or must distribute income;

other receipts as provided in AS

13.38.680

—

13.38.750

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 145 SLA 2003)

Sec. 13.38.640.
Rental property.

To the extent that a trustee accounts for receipts from rental property under this section, the trustee shall allocate an amount received as rent of real or personal property to income, including an amount received for cancellation or renewal of a lease.

An amount received as a refundable deposit, including a security deposit or a deposit that is to be applied as rent for future periods,

shall be added to principal;

shall be held subject to the terms of the lease; and

is not available for distribution to a beneficiary until the trustee’s contractual obligations have been satisfied with respect to that amount.

History.

(§ 2 ch 145 SLA 2003)

Sec. 13.38.650.
Obligation to pay money.

An amount received as interest, whether determined at a fixed, variable, or floating rate, on an obligation to pay money to the trustee, including an amount received as consideration for prepaying principal, shall be allocated to income without any provision for amortization of premium.

A trustee shall allocate to principal an amount received from the sale, redemption, or other disposition of an obligation to pay money to the trustee more than one year after it is purchased or acquired by the trustee, including an obligation if the purchase price or value of the obligation when it is acquired is less than its value at maturity. If the obligation matures within one year after it is purchased or acquired by the trustee, an amount received in excess of its purchase price or its value when acquired by the trust shall be allocated to income.

This section does not apply to an obligation to which AS

13.38.690

,

13.38.700

,

13.38.710

,

13.38.720

,

13.38.730

,

13.38.740

, or

13.38.750

applies.

History.

(§ 2 ch 145 SLA 2003)

Sec. 13.38.660.
Insurance policies and similar contracts.

Except as otherwise provided in (b) or (c) of this section, a trustee shall allocate to principal the proceeds of a life insurance policy or other contract in which the trust or its trustee is named as beneficiary, including a contract that insures the trust or its trustee against loss for damage to, destruction of, or loss of title to a trust asset. If the premiums on the policy or contract are paid from income, the trustee shall allocate dividends on the policy or contract to income. If the premiums on the policy or contract are paid from principal, the trustee shall allocate dividends on the policy or contract to principal.

Except as provided in (c) of this section, a trustee shall allocate to income proceeds of a contract that insures the trustee against

loss of occupancy or other use by an income beneficiary;

loss of income; or

subject to AS

13.38.620

, loss of profits from a business.

This section does not apply to a contract to which AS

13.38.690

applies.

History.

(§ 2 ch 145 SLA 2003)

Sec. 13.38.670.
Special rules for charitable remainder unitrusts.

Notwithstanding the other provisions of this chapter, if a charitable remainder unitrust, as defined in 26 U.S.C. 664 (Internal Revenue Code), owns an obligation described in (2) of this section, the following rules apply, unless varied by the governing instrument:

an obligation for the payment of money is principal at its inventory value except as provided in (2) of this section; the trustee may not make a provision for amortization of a premium or for accumulation for discount;

except to the extent otherwise provided in the governing instrument, an increase in the value of the following above inventory value is distributable as income:

a zero coupon bond;

an annuity contract before annuitization;

a life insurance contract before the death of the insured;

an interest in a common trust fund; in this subparagraph, “common trust fund” has the meaning given in 26 U.S.C. 584 (Internal Revenue Code);

an interest in a limited liability company, limited liability partnership, or limited partnership; and

another obligation for the payment of money if the money is payable at a future time under a fixed, variable, or discretionary schedule of appreciation and if the payment exceeds the price at which the obligation was issued;

the increase in value of the obligations described in (2) of this section is distributable to the beneficiary who was the income beneficiary at the time of the increase; the increase is distributable from the first cash available from the principal or, if cash is not available from the principal, when cash is first available from the principal due to a sale, a redemption, or another disposition; when an unrealized increase is distributed as income from principal, the principal shall be reimbursed when the increase is realized;

the increase in value of an obligation described in (2) of this section is not available for distribution unless the trustee receives cash on account of the obligation;

notwithstanding a provision in this section to the contrary, a distribution from a partnership or limited liability company attributable to the cash flow or income derived from operations regularly carried on by the partnership or limited liability company is income, except to the extent otherwise provided in the governing instrument.

History.

(§ 2 ch 145 SLA 2003)

Sec. 13.38.680.
Insubstantial allocations not required.

If a trustee determines that an allocation between principal and income required by AS

13.38.690

,

13.38.700

,

13.38.710

,

13.38.720

, or

13.38.750

is insubstantial, the trustee may allocate the entire amount to principal unless one of the circumstances described in AS

13.38.210(c)

applies to the allocation. This power may be exercised by a co-trustee in the circumstances described in AS

13.38.210(d)

and may be released for the reasons and in the manner described in AS

13.38.210(e)

. An allocation is presumed to be insubstantial if

the amount of the allocation would increase or decrease net income in an accounting period, as determined before the allocation, by less than five percent; or

the value of the asset producing the receipt for which the allocation would be made is less than five percent of the total value of the trust’s assets at the beginning of the accounting period.

History.

(§ 2 ch 145 SLA 2003)

Sec. 13.38.690.
Retirement benefits, individual retirement accounts, deferred compensation, annuities, and similar payments.

A trustee shall allocate

to income that portion of a payment that equals the greater of the following:

the portion that the payor characterizes as interest, a dividend, a remittance in place of interest, or a remittance in place of a dividend; or

the portion that is characterized as imputed interest for federal income tax purposes;

to principal that portion of a payment that remains after the allocation is made under (1) of this subsection.

If no part of a payment under a contract calling for equal installments over a fixed period of time is allocable to income under the provisions of (a) of this section, the difference between the trust’s acquisition value of the contract and the total expected return is considered to be interest. The trustee shall allocate to income the portion of each payment equivalent to interest on the then unpaid principal balance at the rate specified in the contract or at a rate necessary to amortize the difference between the expected return and the acquisition value, where that rate is readily ascertainable by the trustee.

If no portion of a payment from a separate fund held exclusively for the benefit of the trust is allocable to income under (a) or (b) of this section, but the internal net income of the fund determined as if the fund were a separate trust subject to AS

13.38.200

—

13.38.410

,

13.38.500

—

13.38.690

, or

13.38.710

—

13.38.860

is readily ascertainable by the trustee, the internal net income of the fund is considered to be the income earned by the fund, and the portion of the payment equal to the then undistributed net income of the fund realized since the trust acquired its interest in the fund is considered to be a distribution of that internal net income of the fund and shall be allocated to the trust income account. The balance of the payment described in this subsection shall be allocated to principal. The power to adjust under AS

13.38.210

, the power to convert to a unitrust under AS

13.38.300

, and the provisions of AS

13.38.420

apply to retirement benefits covered by this subsection that are payable to a trust. Those powers and provisions may be exercised by the payee trustee or in the governing instrument for the retirement benefits separately and independently from the exercise by the payee trustee or in the governing instrument of those powers and provisions for the trust, as if the retirement benefits and the trust were separate trusts subject to this chapter.

A trustee shall allocate 10 percent of the part of the payment that is required to be made during the accounting period to income and the balance to principal if there is no part of the payment that is allocable to income under (a) — (c) of this section and all or part of the payment is required to be made. The trustee shall allocate the entire payment to principal if no part of a payment is required to be made or the payment received is the entire amount to which the trustee is entitled. In this subsection, a payment is not “required to be made” to the extent that it is made because the trustee exercises a right of withdrawal.

If, to obtain a federal estate or gift tax marital deduction for a trust, the trustee must allocate more of a payment to income than provided for by this section, the trustee shall allocate to income the additional amount necessary to obtain the marital deduction.

This section does not apply to payments to which AS

13.38.700

applies.

In this section, “payment” means a payment that a trustee may receive over a fixed period of time or during the life of one or more individuals because of services rendered or property transferred to the payor in exchange for future payments, and includes

a payment made in money or property from the payor’s general assets or from a separate fund created by the payor or another person;

a payment on or from

an installment contract or note;

a private or commercial annuity;

a deferred compensation agreement;

an employee death benefit;

an individual retirement account; or

a pension plan, profit-sharing plan, stock plan, bonus plan, or stock-ownership plan.

History.

(§ 2 ch 145 SLA 2003; am §§ 28 — 32 ch 45 SLA 2013)

Sec. 13.38.700.
Liquidating assets.

A trustee shall allocate 10 percent of the receipts from a liquidating asset to income and the balance to principal.

In this section, “liquidating asset”

means

an asset the value of which will diminish or terminate because the asset is expected to produce receipts for a period of limited duration; or

a leasehold, patent, copyright, royalty right, and right to receive payments during a period of more than one year under an arrangement that does not provide for the payment of interest on the unpaid balance;

does not include

an obligation subject to AS

13.38.670

;

a payment subject to AS

13.38.690

;

resources subject to AS

13.38.710

;

timber subject to AS

13.38.720

;

an activity subject to AS

13.38.740

;

an asset subject to AS

13.38.750

; or

an asset for which the trustee establishes a reserve for depreciation under AS

13.38.830

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 145 SLA 2003)

Sec. 13.38.710.
Minerals, water, and other natural resources.

To the extent that a trustee accounts for receipts from an interest in minerals or other natural resources under this section, the trustee shall allocate them as follows:

if received as nominal delay rent or nominal annual rent on a lease, a receipt shall be allocated to income;

if received from a production payment, a receipt shall be allocated to income if and to the extent that the agreement creating the production payment provides a factor for interest or its equivalent; the balance shall be allocated to principal;

if an amount received as a royalty, shut-in-well payment, take-or-pay payment, bonus, or delay rental is more than nominal, 90 percent shall be allocated to principal, and the balance shall be allocated to income;

if an amount is received from a working interest or any other interest not provided for in (1) — (3) of this subsection, 90 percent of the net amount received shall be allocated to principal, and the balance shall be allocated to income.

An amount received on account of an interest in renewable water shall be allocated to income. An amount received on account of an interest in nonrenewable water shall be allocated as follows:

90 percent of the amount shall be allocated to principal; and

the balance shall be allocated to income.

This chapter applies whether or not a decedent or donor was extracting minerals, water, or other natural resources before the interest became subject to the trust.

History.

(§ 2 ch 145 SLA 2003)

Sec. 13.38.720.
Timber.

To the extent that a trustee accounts for receipts from the sale of timber and related products under this section, the trustee shall allocate the net receipts

to income, to the extent that the amount of timber removed from the land does not exceed the rate of growth of the timber during the accounting periods in which a beneficiary has a mandatory income interest;

to principal, to the extent that the amount of timber removed from the land exceeds the rate of growth of the timber, or the net receipts are from the sale of standing timber;

between income and principal, by determining the amount of timber removed from the land under the lease or contract and applying the rules in (1) and (2) of this subsection if the net receipts are from the lease of timberland or a contract to cut timber from land owned by a trust;

to principal to the extent that advance payments, bonuses, and other payments are not allocated under (1) — (3) of this subsection.

In determining net receipts to be allocated under (a) of this section, a trustee shall deduct and transfer to principal a reasonable amount for depletion.

This chapter applies whether or not a decedent or transferor was harvesting timber from the property before it became subject to the trust.

History.

(§ 2 ch 145 SLA 2003)

Sec. 13.38.730.
Property not productive of income; marital deduction.

If a federal estate or gift tax marital deduction is allowed for all or part of a trust whose income is required to be paid to the settlor’s or testator’s spouse and whose assets consist substantially of property that does not provide the spouse with sufficient income from or use of the trust assets, and if the amounts that the trustee transfers from principal to income under AS

13.38.210

and that the trustee distributes to the spouse from principal under the governing instrument are insufficient to provide the spouse with the beneficial enjoyment required to obtain the marital deduction, the spouse may require the trustee to make property productive of income, convert property within a reasonable time, or exercise the power conferred by AS

13.38.210(a)

. The trustee may decide which action or combination of actions to take. The income interest for a marital deduction trust described in this subsection shall be paid at least annually.

In cases not governed by (a) of this section, proceeds from the sale or other disposition of an asset are principal without regard to the amount of income the asset produces during any accounting period.

Unless otherwise provided by the trust instrument, a power or authority granted to a trustee, except for the authority to refrain from electing qualified terminal interest property treatment under 26 U.S.C. 2056 or 2523 (Internal Revenue Code), does not prevent a qualifying trust from being eligible for the marital deduction. All powers granted to a trustee shall be construed consistently with this subsection. In this subsection, “qualifying trust” means a trust

that is designated in the trust instrument as a trust eligible for the federal estate or gift tax marital deduction; or

if it can be inferred from the trust instrument that the grantor intended the trust to be eligible for the federal estate or gift tax marital deduction.

History.

(§ 2 ch 145 SLA 2003; am §§ 6, 7 ch 82 SLA 2004)

Sec. 13.38.740.
Derivatives and options.

To the extent that a trustee does not account under AS

13.38.620

for transactions in derivatives, the trustee shall allocate receipts from and disbursements made in connection with those transactions to principal.

If a trustee grants an option to buy property from the trust, whether or not the trust owns the property when the option is granted, grants an option that permits another person to sell property to the trust, or acquires an option to buy property for the trust or an option to sell an asset owned by the trust, and the trustee or other owner of the asset is required to deliver the asset if the option is exercised, an amount received for granting the option shall be allocated to principal. An amount paid to acquire the option shall be paid from principal. A gain or loss realized upon the exercise of an option, including an option granted to a settlor or testator of the trust for services rendered, shall be allocated to principal.

In this section, “derivative” means a contract or financial instrument or a combination of contracts and financial instruments that gives a trust the right or obligation to participate in some or all changes in the price of a tangible or intangible asset or group of assets, or changes in a rate, an index of prices or rates, or another market indicator for an asset or a group of assets.

History.

(§ 2 ch 145 SLA 2003)

Sec. 13.38.750.
Asset-backed securities.

If a trust receives a payment from interest or other current return and from other proceeds of the collateral financial assets, the trustee shall allocate the portion of the payment that the payor identifies as being from interest or other current return to income, and the trustee shall allocate the balance of the payment to principal.

If a trust receives one or more payments in exchange for the trust’s entire interest in an asset-backed security in one accounting period, the trustee shall allocate the payments to principal. If a payment is one of a series of payments that will result in the liquidation of the trust’s interest in the security over more than one accounting period, the trustee shall allocate 10 percent of the payment to income and the balance to principal.

In this section, “asset-backed security”

means an asset whose value is based on the right it gives the owner to receive distributions from the proceeds of financial assets that provide collateral for the security;

includes an asset that gives the owner the right to receive from the collateral financial assets only the interest or other current return or only the proceeds other than interest or current return;

does not include an asset to which AS

13.38.600

or

13.38.690

applies.

History.

(§ 2 ch 145 SLA 2003)